Louisiana, session 2026, SB55.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:295.1(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§295.1. Safety belt use; tags indicating exemption
A.(1) Each driver of a passenger car, van, sports utility vehicle, or truck
having a gross weight of twenty-six thousand pounds or less in this state shall have
a safety belt properly fastened about his or her body and worn across both the lap
and shoulder as designed, and not placed behind the body or under the arm at
all times when the vehicle is in forward motion. The provisions of this Section shall
not apply to those cars, vans, sports utility vehicles, or pickups manufactured prior
to January 1, 1981.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.